District of Columbia statutes.
3-601

Purpose.

It is the purpose of this chapter to create a Boxing and Wrestling Commission for the District of Columbia with the authority to promulgate rules and regulations, to promote the District of Columbia as a location for boxing, wrestling and martial arts events, and to regulate boxing and wrestling within its jurisdiction.

Oct. 8, 1975, D.C. Law 1-20, § 2, 23 DCR 1806
Feb. 26, 1976, D.C. Law 1-50, § 3, 22 DCR 5127
Sept. 29, 1988, D.C. Law 7-169, § 2(a), 35 DCR 5749
1981 Ed., § 2-601.
1973 Ed., § 2-1231.